Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, Any
person who intentionally blocks or prevents access to a public roadway or highway while
protesting with the express purpose of preventing passage of others shall be punished by
imprisonment in state prison for not more than 10 years or by a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars and imprisonment in jail or house of correction for not more than two and one
half years.
of 1